Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.116

Simultaneous consideration of incorporation and annexation of territory.

A boundary review board may simultaneously consider the proposed incorporation of a city or town, and the proposed annexation of a portion of the territory included in the proposed incorporation, if the resolution or petition initiating the annexation is adopted or filed ninety or fewer days after the petition proposing the incorporation was filed.

[ 1994 c 216 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.